Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.060

Participating agencies may appropriate funds and provide personnel, property, and services.

Any public agency entering into an agreement pursuant to this chapter may appropriate funds and may sell, lease, give, or otherwise supply property, personnel, and services to the administrative joint board or other legal or administrative entity created to operate the joint or cooperative undertaking.

[ 1992 c 161 s 7; 1967 c 239 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—1992 c 161: See note following RCW 70.44.450.